inc/flattened/excel2fst/VII.lexc
LEXICON VII_magad_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:k # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:kiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:sininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:sinodogen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:sininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:sinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:sininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:sinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:sininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:sinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:iniwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:odogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:iniwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:odog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:inigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:ogoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:iniwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:oon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:iniiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ooban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = n   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_n_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_n_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_n_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_n_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_n_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_n_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_n_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:zininiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:zinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:zininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:zinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:zininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:zinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:zininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:zinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:giban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:zininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:zinodogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:zininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:zinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:zininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:zininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:zinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:zinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:zininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:zinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:zininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:zinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:zinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:zinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:zininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:zininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:zinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:zinoobaniin  # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:zininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:zinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:iniwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:odogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:iniwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:odog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:inigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:ogoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:iniwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:oon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:iniiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ooban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = o   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_o_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_o_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_o_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_o_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_o_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_o_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_o_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:niniwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:noon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:nini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx:n # ;
